Utah statutes.
53B-20-104.   Buildings and facilities -- Board approval of construction and purchases -- Rules.

(1)  The board shall approve all new construction, repair, or purchase of educational and general buildings and facilities financed from any source at all institutions subject to the jurisdiction of the board.

(2) An institution may not submit plans or specifications to the State Building Board for the construction or alteration of buildings, structures, or facilities or for the purchases of equipment or fixtures for the structure without the authorization of the board.

(3)  The board shall make rules establishing the conditions under which facilities may be eligible to request state funds for operations and maintenance.

(4)  Before approving the purchase of a building, the board shall:

(a)  determine whether or not the building will be eligible for state funds for operations and maintenance by applying the rules adopted under Subsection (3); and

(b)  if the annual request for state funding for operations and maintenance will be greater than $100,000, notify the speaker of the House, the president of the Senate, and the cochairs of the Infrastructure and General Government subcommittee of the Legislature's Joint Appropriation Committee.



Amended by Chapter 242, 2012 General Session

